lexc/adj/enhuadjigem.lexc
! enhuadj1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [stem]  +Adj @U.ART.PRESENT@ @U.ART.ABSENT@ 

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter +Pref+ +Mid
+Ik
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§ §oeoezmid§ §OEOE4a§ §JJ§ §JPJ§ §Jnull§ §JPnull§
§VV§ §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §oeoebb§ 
§oeoez1§ §oeoez11§ §OEOE11§ 
§oeoeadjoe§ §oeoez4§ §oeoez4a§ §ooez13§ §oeoez1e§ §oeoez11e§
§oeoeza§ §oeoezoe§



LEXICON Root
Prefleg;
Prefigekoto;

LEXICON Prefleg
leg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefigekoto ; ! optional article prefix
legesleg@U.ART.PRESENT@       Prefigekoto ; ! optional article prefix
                        Prefigekoto ; ! empty string entry

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Adj;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Adj;
+Pref+:széjjel   Adj;
+Pref+:szembe   Adj;
+Pref+:szerte   Adj;
+Pref+:vissza   Adj;
+Pref+:helyre   Adj;
+Pref+:tovább   Adj;
+Pref+:tönkre   Adj;
+Pref+:észre   Adj;
+Pref+:rajta   Adj;
+Pref+:előre   Adj;
+Pref+:félbe   Adj;
+Pref+:félre   Adj;
+Pref+:felül   Adj;
+Pref+:fölül   Adj;
+Pref+:agyon   Adj;
+Pref+:ellen   Adj;
+Pref+:körbe   Adj;
+Pref+:körül   Adj;
+Pref+:közbe   Adj;
+Pref+:közre   Adj;
+Pref+:külön   Adj;
+Pref+:utána   Adj;
+Pref+:végbe   Adj;
+Pref+:végig   Adj;
+Pref+:hátra   Adj;
+Pref+:hozzá   Adj;
+Pref+:egybe   Adj;
+Pref+:ketté   Adj;
+Pref+:össze   Adj;
+Pref+:mellé   Adj;
+Pref+:által   Adj;
+Pref+:alul   Adj;
+Pref+:haza   Adj;
+Pref+:újra   Adj;
+Pref+:abba   Adj;
+Pref+:neki   Adj;
+Pref+:bele   Adj;
+Pref+:újjá   Adj;
+Pref+:benn   Adj;
+Pref+:fenn   Adj;
+Pref+:fönn   Adj;
+Pref+:jóvá   Adj;
+Pref+:szét   Adj;
+Pref+:tele   Adj;
+Pref+:tova   Adj;
+Pref+:meg   Adj;
+Pref+:oda   Adj;
+Pref+:elő   Adj;
+Pref+:túl   Adj;
+Pref+:alá   Adj;
+Pref+:föl   Adj;
+Pref+:ide   Adj;
+Pref+:fel   Adj;
+Pref+:rá   Adj;
+Pref+:ki   Adj;
+Pref+:le   Adj;
+Pref+:el   Adj;
+Pref+:át   Adj;
+Pref+:be   Adj;
            Adj;


LEXICON AddAdjmely1Igekepzo
0:andó AddAdjboe;
0:ható AddAdjboe;
0:ott AddAdjboeot;
0:ó AddAdjboe;

LEXICON AddAdjmely2Igekepzo
0:andó AddAdjboe;
0:ható AddAdjboe;
0:t AddAdjboeaejaje;
0:ó AddAdjboe;

LEXICON AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo
0:endő AddAdjboe;
0:hető AddAdjboe;
0:ett AddAdjboe;
0:ő AddAdjboe;

LEXICON AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo
0:endő AddAdjboe;
0:hető AddAdjboe;
0:t AddAdjboeaejaje;
0:ő AddAdjboe;

LEXICON AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo
0:endő AddAdjboe;
0:hető AddAdjboe;
0:ött AddAdjboe;
0:ő AddAdjboe;

! al only with these

LEXICON AddAdjboe
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1boe;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseboe;


Lexicon Tocaseboe
[stem]+Adj:0     Possboe;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plurboe;
[stem]+Adj:0     Famboe1;

LEXICON Possboe
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l     #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Famboe;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Famboe;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Famboe;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famboe;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Famboe;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famboe;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famboe;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famboe;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famboe;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famboe;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famboe;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famboe;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famboe1;

LEXICON Plurboe
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Genboe; 
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoeadjoe§k    Genboe2; 
                       Genboe1;

LEXICON Famboe
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genboe;
                       Genboe;

LEXICON Famboe1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genboe;
                       Genboe1;

LEXICON Genboe
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseboe;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseboe;
                       Caseboe;
LEXICON Genboe1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseboe;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseboe;
                       Caseboe1;

LEXICON Genboe2
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseboe;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseboe;
                       Caseboe2;


LEXICON Caseboe
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez4§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoe§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Caseboe1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez4§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoe§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Caseboe2
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez4§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez4a§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoe§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
                            Ik;

Lexicon Tocase1boe
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possmboe;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plurmboe;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Famboe11;

LEXICON Adj
alapul AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
approbál AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
babosít AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;     
balhézett AddAdjboe;
bigottul AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
borsoz AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;     
bájosul AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;     
bántató AddAdjboe;
bögyösít AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;     
bőgőz AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;
bőszül AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
cigányosít AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;     
cserget AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;
csevetel AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
csillogandó AddAdjboe;
csipkelőd AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;     
csámcsog AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;
cövekel AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
deaktivál AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
dimenzionálandó AddAdjboe;
diszponál AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
dolgoztat AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;
dribliz AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;
döcög AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;
dördül AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
dünnyög AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;
egyéniesül AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
együgyűsít AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;     
ellethető AddAdjboe;
engesztelőd AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;     
erkölcstelenít AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;     
explodál AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
faluz AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;
fehérel AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
fejleszthetetlen AddAdjboe;
felelget AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;
feslőd AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;     
fontolásbeli AddAdjboe;
frakcióz AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;
fájdogál AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
félénkül AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
fémesít AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;     
fűzető AddAdjboe;
gyakorlód AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;     
gyepesít AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;     
gyérül AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
gyötrőd AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;     
hagyástalan AddAdjboe;     
happol AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
hasasít AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;     
hebetel AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
hegyesít AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;     
hempergődz AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;
hitetlenedhető AddAdjboe;
hártyásít AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;     
hőköl AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
időmértékesít AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;     
igázható AddAdjboe;
importál AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
jelölőd AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;     
játszód AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;     
jóváhagyható AddAdjboe;
kajál AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
kedvezményesít AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;     
keselyül AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
kisfilmesít AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;     
kobozandó AddAdjboe;
komissióz AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;
kompaktul AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
kumulál AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
kárhozatosít AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;     
kártékonyodó AddAdjboe;
kérődz AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;
kétségesít AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;     
körmöl AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
kövérsz AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;
közönyösödő AddAdjboe;
külterjesít AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;     
lotyog AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;
lángol AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
láttamozható AddAdjboe;
lélegeztet AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;
lökőd AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;     
mentesül AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
mintásít AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;     
murisul AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
mérséklőd AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;     
módszeresít AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;     
nehézkesedett AddAdjboe;
nyervog AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;
nőiesít AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;     
nőz AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;
obszcénül AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
oszcillál AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
pajzánít AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;     
petrencéző AddAdjboe;
poncol AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
profiloz AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;
prémez AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;
püfög AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;
rappel AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
recenzeál AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
retrospektívedő AddAdjboe;
revolverez AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;
rogyaszt AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;
rötyög AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;
seftel AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
selypeg AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;
sematizál AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
slattyog AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;     
szakrálisodható AddAdjboe;
szarval AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
szeldel AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
szemléletesít AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;     
szeszélyesül AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
sziesztáz AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;
szuvasul AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
száműz AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;
szépségesít AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;     
szórható AddAdjboe;
szürkül AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
sátorosít AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;     
süvölt AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;
testesül AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
tezaurál AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
torzulástalan AddAdjboe;     
treníroz AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;
táncikál AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
tépőd AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;     
tömegesít AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;     
tüzesül AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
tőröz AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;
valóságosít AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;     
velárisodható AddAdjboe;
viccelőd AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;     
viszonyul AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
vél AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
zökkenőmentesít AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;     
ábrándítandó AddAdjboe;
éldegél AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
értekeződ AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;     
ócskul AddAdjmely2Igekepzo;
ökörköd AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;
önindukciósít AddAdjmely1Igekepzo;     
üdít AddAdjmagas1Igekepzo;     
ügyesked AddAdjmagas3Igekepzo;     
üledékesül AddAdjmagas2Igekepzo;
